District of Columbia statutes.
50-1105

Vehicles not inspected, or unsafe.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent may refuse to register any motor vehicle or trailer which has not been inspected as required, or which is unsafe or improperly equipped, or otherwise unfit to be operated, and for like reason he may revoke or suspend any registration already made; provided, that the provisions of § 50-1403.01(a) shall be applicable in all cases where registration is refused, revoked, or suspended under the terms of this chapter.

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 5
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 40-205.
1981 Ed., § 40-205.